Alabama, session 2026rs, SB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
SB224 INTRODUCED
29 Section 1. Sections 31-6-4, 31-6-6, and 31-6-9, Code of
30 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
31 "§31-6-4
32 (a)(1) Any child whose father or mother meets any of
33 the following criteria may attend any qualifying school for a
34 period of five standard academic years, not to exceed 45
35 months or the equivalent of 45 months if enrolled part-time,
36 pursuant to the tuition reimbursement guidelines as provided
37 in subsection (c):
38 a. Was killed or died in line of duty or is listed as
39 missing in action or is or was a prisoner of war or whose
40 death or permanent total disabilities were service-connected
41 while serving as a member of the armed forces;Armed Forces.
42 b. Died from a disability incurred from military
43 service, as established by the State Department of
44 Veterans'Veterans Affairs, after having been discharged under
45 conditions other than dishonorable and after having served at
46 least 90 days consecutively in the armed forcesArmed Forces
47 prior to and/or subsequent to the date on which the disability
48 occurred, or who was honorably discharged by reason of a
49 qualifying service-connected disability after serving less
50 than 90 days;.
51 c. Was killed or died while on state active duty status
52 as defined in Section 31-12-1, or whose death results
53 proximately and within three years from an injury received
54 while on state active duty status; or.
55 d. Has been assigned 100 percent permanent or total
56 disability rated by the United States Veterans'
Page 2

disability rated by the United States Veterans'
SB224 INTRODUCED
57 AdministrationDepartment of Veterans Affairs, or was
58 discharged or retired from the armed forcesArmed Forces with a
59 4030 percent or more disability and maintained that
60 percentage.
61 (2) Training under this section must be initiated prior
62 to the child's thirtieth birthday, and must be completed
63 within eight years after its initiation, except for delays
64 caused by military service during the training period, and in
65 no case may training be received under this chapter beyond the
66 thirty-eighth birthday of the child.
67 (b) The educational benefits provided by this section
68 to children making application for benefits for the first time
69 beginning with the fall term of the 2014-2015 academic year,
70 and thereafter, shall be limited to undergraduate courses of
71 study only, and the value of tuition paid shall be limited to
72 the in-state tuition rate of the qualifying school attended.
73 (c) For those first filing for benefits under this
74 chapter on or after July 31, 2017, and for those attending a
75 qualifying private school, the educational benefit shall be
76 for tuition reimbursement and books and fees reimbursement.
77 The value of tuition paid per semester hour (or equivalent),
78 or equivalent, shall be limited to four hundred dollars
79 ($400). The value of the books and fees paid per semester
80 shall be limited to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per student.
81 (d) For the purpose of the minimum disability
82 requirement provided for in subdivision (a)(4), the dependent
83 of any veteran whose disability rating as of July 31, 2017, is
84 at least 20 percent but less than 40 percent shall qualify for
Page 3

at least 20 percent but less than 40 percent shall qualify for
SB224 INTRODUCED
85 the benefits of this chapter, provided that the dependent
86 shall file application for the benefits before July 31, 2023,
87 and the dependent is reasonably expected to be eligible to
88 attend a qualifying school in the next academic year."
89 "§31-6-6
90 (a) The spouse and children of any veteran who is
91 suffering from 4030 to 90 percent service-connected disability
92 brought about from service in the Armed Forces of the United
93 States, or the widow and children of a deceased veteran who
94 was suffering from 4030 percent or more of service-connected
95 disability at the time of death, as established by the State
96 Department of Veterans'Veterans Affairs, shall be entitled to
97 the following educational advantages and opportunities:
98 (1) The spouse or widow shall be entitled to up to 27
99 months of schooling, or the equivalent of 27 months if
100 enrolled part-time, in any qualifying school, pursuant to the
101 tuition reimbursement guidelines as provided in subsection
102 (d)(c). One change of program shall be allowed without
103 counseling. All training received at qualifying schools under
104 this subdivision must be completed within a period of six
105 years after its initiation.
106 (2) Each child of a disabled veteran shall be entitled
107 to five standard academic years, or the equivalent of 45
108 months if enrolled part-time, in any qualifying school
109 pursuant to the tuition reimbursement guidelines as provided
110 in subsection (d)(c). One change of program shall be allowed
111 without counseling. Training under this subdivision must be
112 initiated prior to the child's twenty-sixth birthday, and must
Page 4

initiated prior to the child's twenty-sixth birthday, and must
SB224 INTRODUCED
113 be completed within eight years after its initiation, except
114 for delays caused by military service during the training
115 period, and in no case may training be received under this
116 section beyond the thirty-fourth birthday of the child.
117 (b) For the purpose of the minimum disability
118 requirement provided for in subsection (a), the dependent of
119 any veteran whose disability rating as of July 31, 2017, is at
120 least 20 percent but less than 40 percent shall qualify for
121 the benefits of this chapter, provided that the dependent
122 shall file application for benefits before July 31, 2023, and
123 the dependent is reasonably expected to be eligible to attend
124 a qualifying school in the next academic year.
125 (c)(b) The educational benefits provided by this
126 section to spouses, children, and widows making application
127 for benefits for the first time beginning with the fall term
128 of the 2014-2015 academic year, and thereafter, shall be
129 limited to undergraduate courses of study only, and the value
130 of tuition paid shall be limited to the in-state tuition rate
131 of the qualifying school attended.
132 (d)(c) For those first filing for benefits under this
133 chapter on or after July 31, 2017, and for those attending a
134 qualifying private school, the educational benefit shall be
135 for tuition reimbursement and books and fees reimbursement.
136 The value of tuition paid per semester hour (or equivalent),
137 or equivalent, shall be limited to four hundred dollars
138 ($400). The value of the books and fees paid per semester
139 shall be limited to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
140 student."
Page 5

student."
SB224 INTRODUCED
141 "§31-6-9
142 (a) For those dependents who first file for benefits
143 under this chapter prior to July 31, 2017, the benefits
144 provided under this chapter shall be in addition to any other
145 state or federal benefits to which that dependent may be
146 entitled.
147 (b) For dependents who first file for benefits under
148 this chapter on or after July 31, 2017, and for those
149 attending a qualifying private school:
150 (1) To the extent permitted by law, prior to applying
151 any benefits provided for under this chapter, institutional
152 certifying officials and financial aid officials shall first
153 apply other federal, state, institutional, and third
154 partythird-party scholarships and grants awarded to the
155 dependent for that academic period for payment of required
156 educational expenses during an academic period.;
157 (2) A completed Free Application for Federal Student
158 Aid (FAFSA), or the equivalent, must be submitted to the
159 United States Department of Education for each year in which
160 the dependent receives benefits under this chapter. The
161 dependent shall have applied for all federal student financial
162 aid grants, including, but not limited to, Pell Grants,
163 Supplemental Education Opportunity Grants, and Education and
164 Training Vouchers, identified as being available for the
165 student's application by Federal Student Aid, an office of the
166 United States Department of Education, or its successor
167 agency.;
168 (3) All students receiving educational benefits under
Page 6

(3) All students receiving educational benefits under
SB224 INTRODUCED
169 this chapter and the qualifying schools they attend must
170 comply with the standards of Satisfactory Academic Progress
171 (SAP) as required for Title IV benefits under the Higher
172 Education Act and as defined by that qualifying school. Those
173 students who would no longer be eligible to receive Title IV
174 benefits due to a failure to meet SAP standards shall no
175 longer be eligible to receive benefits under this chapter.
176 Each qualifying school shall notify the State Department of
177 Veterans'Veterans Affairs of any student who currently holds a
178 certificate of eligibility for benefits under this chapter who
179 is no longer eligible to receive benefits due to a failure to
180 meet SAP standards and the effective date of that change in
181 eligibility.; and
182 (4) The dependent shall ensure that all qualifying
183 schools he or she attends under this program are authorized to
184 release the personally identifiable information to the State
185 Department of Veterans'Veterans Affairs as is required for the
186 determination of that dependent's continued eligibility and as
187 required for the completion of all reports required by law.
188 (c) Any dependent who receives benefits under this
189 chapter, and whose benefit period is interrupted due to
190 accident, injury, or illness, shall have the benefit time
191 period which is lost due to the accident, illness, or injury
192 restored to him or her.
193 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
194 to the contrary, dependents of any veteran whose disability
195 rating, if any, prior to May 23, 2017, was less than 20
196 percent, but who had a claim for compensation pending prior to
Page 7

percent, but who had a claim for compensation pending prior to
SB224 INTRODUCED
197 that date which resulted in a final award by the United States
198 Department of Veterans Affairs of at least 20 percent, shall
199 be eligible for education benefits as the chapter read prior
200 to May 23, 2017, if the dependent files an application for
201 benefits under this chapter within six months of that final
202 adjudication and provides proof satisfactory to the State
203 Department of Veterans'Veterans Affairs that he or she
204 qualifies under this exception and currently satisfies the
205 eligibility requirements as the chapter read prior to May 23,
206 2017."
207 Section 2. (a) Notwithstanding provisions of Section
208 31-6-11, Code of Alabama 1975, to the contrary, beginning on
209 January 1, 2027, dependents who would be eligible to receive
210 benefits under this chapter but for their inability to show
211 the qualifying veteran was a permanent resident of the State
212 of Alabama for at least one year immediately prior to his or
213 her entrance into service may be eligible to receive
214 educational benefits under this chapter where they can show
215 the qualifying veteran:
216 (1) Has, or had at the time of his or her death, a
217 minimum disability rating of 50 percent; and
218 (2) Has been a permanent resident of this state for at
219 least five years immediately prior to the filing of the
220 application for benefits under this section or immediately
221 prior to his or her death if the veteran is deceased.
222 (b) The educational benefits provided by this section
223 shall be provided to not more than 100 dependents annually.
224 Priority of dependents accepted shall be based on the highest
Page 8

Priority of dependents accepted shall be based on the highest
SB224 INTRODUCED
225 disability rating of the qualifying veterans.
226 (c) The benefits provided by this section shall be the
227 same as benefits provided for dependents as described in
228 Chapter 6, Title 31, Code of Alabama 1975.
229 (d) The educational benefits authorized pursuant to
230 this section shall expire on December 31, 2028, unless
231 extended by an act of the Legislature.
232 Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 9